Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Chapter 14. Youth in Agriculture, Natural Resources, and Food Production

§ 1151.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that:

Agriculture, natural resources, and food production play a central role in the economy and culture of Vermont.

Farms and farm-based industries are experiencing an ever-increasing need for workers who are willing to work the hours involved in farming and who have the multiple skills necessary to handle successfully the multiple and varied responsibilities of farming.

Farms have always provided the environment for youth to acquire workplace skills such as responsibility, creativity, and initiative and occupational skills ranging from plant and animal science to economics and to grow therefore into sought-after workers by a wide variety of employers.

Programs such as the Farm Youth Corps have provided the infrastructure that is necessary to connect youth to careers in agriculture, natural resources, and food production.

Programs that have provided youth with the opportunity to work on farms have declined due to reductions in federal funding.

Therefore, it is the purpose of this chapter to create and support programs for youth that will engage them in agriculture, natural resources, and food production in order to:

Provide them an opportunity to engage in work that provides them with hands-on learning and allows them to develop a strong work ethic and vital workplace and occupational skills that will be valuable in any career they might pursue.

Encourage youth to pursue pathways to careers in agriculture, natural resources, and food production.

Provide farmers with young short-term workers and the opportunity to mentor future, long-term employees.

Ensure that youth are aware of the benefits of agriculture, natural resources, and food production to themselves and to Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 164a.

§ 1152.
Youth in Agriculture, Natural Resources, and Food Production Consortium; creation.

There is created a Youth in Agriculture, Natural Resources, and Food Production Consortium of program providers in order that programs to build pathways to careers in agriculture, natural resources, and food production may be connected, developed, and supported in a coordinated manner. The Consortium shall comprise employees of the Department of Labor assigned by the Commissioner of Labor; employees of the Agency of Education assigned by the Secretary of Education; employees of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets appointed by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets; employees of the Agency of Natural Resources appointed by the Secretary of Natural Resources; representatives of the Extension Service of the University of Vermont selected by the Service; and representatives from agriculture, food, and natural resources businesses appointed by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

The consortium shall be attached to the Department of Labor for administrative support. It shall elect its own chair and meet as required to fulfill its obligations under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 164a; amended

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 265, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1153.
Youth in Agriculture, Natural Resources, and Food Production Consortium; powers and duties.

The Consortium shall be charged with the oversight of the development and coordination of programs in agriculture, natural resources, and food production, and education to connect youths’ experiences in agriculture, natural resources, and food production to their in-school learning and develop pathways for pursuing further education related to agriculture or natural resources. It shall seek to coordinate and connect programs around common standards, coordinate resources, provide a clearinghouse for information and technical assistance, establish a strong business and education partnership, identify missing components of the system, and oversee funds made available for the express purpose of implementing these pathways. It shall endeavor to sustain and expand programming in agriculture, natural resources, and food production on a statewide basis in order to affect middle and secondary school students in Vermont. The Consortium shall seek to ensure the effectiveness of all the programs in reaching large numbers of students, and in so far as possible, seek to provide programs in all regions of the State through a statewide system with uniform availability, eligibility, and funding requirements to make such opportunities available to all students.

Among the programs to be reviewed and coordinated by the Consortium are projects that involve agriculture and the environment; programs within the elementary and middle school system that provide hands-on learning, such as “Ag in the Classroom” sponsored by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, and “Forest, Fields, and Futures” sponsored by UVM Extension; and secondary school programs in agriculture and natural resources-related areas in education; “Smokeyhouse” and other career technical education, agriculture, and natural resources programs offered by high schools and regional CTE centers. In addition, it shall review and coordinate programs such as the Youth Conservation Corps and the Farm Youth Corps of the Department of Labor, which has offered summer employment for students on farms, and other summer employment programs and alternative programs for in-school youth operated outside the public school funding system.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 164a; amended

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 266, 302, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2017, No. 74

, §§ 46, 142.